Florida, session 2026, SB1188.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âPresent subsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 13 180.191, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (3), 14 (4), and (5), respectively, a new subsection (2) is added to 15 that section, and subsection (1) of that section is amended, to 16 read: 17 180.191âLimitation on rates charged consumer outside city 18 limits.â 19 (1)âAny municipality within this the state operating a 20 water or sewer utility outside of the boundaries of such 21 municipality shall charge consumers outside the municipal 22 boundaries rates, fees, and charges determined in one of the 23 following manners: 24 (a)âIt may charge the same rates, fees, and charges as 25 consumers inside the municipal boundaries. However, in addition 26 thereto, the municipality may add a surcharge of not more than 27 25 percent of such rates, fees, and charges to consumers outside 28 the municipal boundaries, except as provided in subsection (2). 29 Fixing of such rates, fees, and charges in this manner shall not 30 require a public hearing except as may be provided for service 31 to consumers inside the municipality. 32 (b)âIt may charge rates, fees, and charges that are just 33 and equitable and that which are based on the same factors used 34 in fixing the rates, fees, and charges for consumers inside the 35 municipal boundaries, except as provided in subsection (2). In 36 addition thereto, except as provided in subsection (2), the 37 municipality may add a surcharge not to exceed 25 percent of 38 such rates, fees, and charges for said services to consumers 39 outside the municipal boundaries. However, the total of all such 40 rates, fees, and charges for the services to consumers outside 41 the boundaries may shall not be more than 50 percent in excess 42 of the total amount the municipality charges consumers served 43 within the municipality for corresponding service. No Such 44 rates, fees, and charges may not shall be fixed until after a 45 public hearing at which all of the users of the water or sewer 46 systems; owners, tenants, or occupants of property served or to 47 be served thereby; and all others interested must shall have an 48 opportunity to be heard concerning the proposed rates, fees, and 49 charges. Any change or revision of such rates, fees, or charges 50 may be made in the same manner as such rates, fees, or charges 51 were originally established, but if such change or revision is 52 to be made substantially pro rata as to all classes of service, 53 both inside and outside the municipality, no hearing or notice 54 is shall be required. 55 (2)âA municipality within this state which operates a water 56 or sewer utility providing service to customers in another 57 recipient municipality shall charge consumers in the recipient 58 municipality the same rates, fees, and charges as it does the 59 consumers inside its own municipal boundaries. 60 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.